Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 318, O.S.L.
2022 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1173.1), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1173.1. A. Whenever a law enforcement agency receives
a complaint of stalking and finds that such conduct has occurred,
HB1002 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the law enforcement agency shall be required to provide a copy of a
Stalking Warning Letter to the accused provided that the victim does
not otherwise request that such letter not be served upon the
accused. The Stalking Warning Letter shall be served upon the
accused in the same manner as a bench warrant. If the service is to
be in another county, the court clerk may issue service to the
sheriff by facsimile or other electronic transmission for service by
the sheriff and may receive the return of service from the sheriff
in the same manner
B. The following statutory form of the Stalking Warning Letter,
as required by the provisions of subsection A of this section, shall
be utilized by law enforcement agencies throughout the state:
__________________________________ COUNTY, STATE OF OKLAHOMA
CITY OF _______________________________
RE: _______________________________________________________________
(COMPLAINANT)
Stalking Warning Letter served to: _________________________________
_________________________________
(HOME ADDRESS)
_________________________________
(DATE OF BIRTH)
The __________________________ has recently investigated a complaint
(LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY)
about your behavior towards the above-named individual.
HB1002 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

The behavior you have engaged in could be interpreted as "stalking"
as provided for in Section 1173 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. Stalking can be described as intentionally engaging in a
course of conduct directed at a specific person that would cause a
reasonable person under the same circumstances to suffer serious
emotional distress, or place the specific person in reasonable fear
of bodily injury. Your behavior has induced such fear or distress
in the above-named individual.
Oklahoma law makes stalking a crime. The __________________________
(LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY)
takes this law very seriously.
Please consider this a formal warning that any future conduct by you
towards the above-named individual could result in arrest by law
enforcement and prosecution by the ______________________ County
District Attorney's Office.
_______________________________________________
Print name of Chief of Law Enforcement Agency
_______________________________________________
Signature of Chief of Law Enforcement Agency or designee
Served in hand __________________ by _______________________________
(DATE) (NAME OF OFFICER)
On behalf of the ____________________________________
(LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY)
at __________________________________________________
HB1002 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(LOCATION) notify the victim of the availability
to meet with a representative of a certified domestic violence
program, as provided for in Section 18p-1 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/10/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.

















HB1002 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.